Florida, session 2026, SB742.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 27 28 Section 1.âSubsection (4) and paragraph (a) of subsection 29 (5) of section 464.019, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 30 464.019âApproval of nursing education programs.â 31 (4)âINTERNET WEBSITE.âThe board shall publish the following 32 information on its Internet website: 33 (a)âA list of each accredited program conducted in the 34 state and the programâs graduate passage rates for the most 35 recent 2 calendar years, which the department shall determine 36 through the following sources: 37 1.âFor a programâs accreditation status, the specialized 38 accrediting agencies that are nationally recognized by the 39 United States Secretary of Education to accredit nursing 40 education programs. 41 2.âFor a programâs graduate passage rates, the contract 42 testing service of the National Council of State Boards of 43 Nursing. 44 (b)âThe following data for each approved program, which 45 includes, to the extent applicable: 46 1.âAll documentation provided by the program in its program 47 application. 48 2.âThe summary description of the programâs compliance 49 submitted under subsection (3). 50 3.âThe programâs accreditation status, including 51 identification of the accrediting agency. 52 4.âThe programâs probationary status. 53 5.âThe programâs graduate passage rates for first-, second 54 , and third-time test takers for the most recent 2 calendar 55 years. 56 6.âEach programâs retention rates for students tracked from 57 program entry to graduation. 58 (c)âThe average passage rates for United States educated, 59 first-, second-, and third-time first-time test takers on the 60 National Council of State Boards of Nursing Licensing 61 Examination for the most recent 2 calendar years, as calculated 62 by the contract testing service of the National Council of State 63 Boards of Nursing. The average passage rates shall be published 64 separately for each type of comparable degree program listed in 65 subparagraph (5)(a)1. 66 67 The information required to be published under this subsection 68 shall be made available in a manner that allows interactive 69 searches and comparisons of individual programs selected by the 70 website user. The board shall update the Internet website at 71 least quarterly with the available information. 72 (5)âACCOUNTABILITY.â 73 (a)1.âAn approved program must achieve a graduate passage 74 rate for first-, second-, and third-time first-time test takers 75 which is not more than 10 percentage points lower than the 76 average passage rate during the same calendar year for graduates 77 of comparable degree programs who are United States educated, 78 first-, second-, and third-time first-time test takers on the 79 National Council of State Boards of Nursing Licensing 80 Examination, as calculated by the contract testing service of 81 the National Council of State Boards of Nursing. For purposes of 82 this subparagraph, an approved program is comparable to all 83 degree programs of the same program type from among the 84 following program types: 85 a.âProfessional nursing education programs that terminate 86 in a bachelorâs degree. 87 b.âProfessional nursing education programs that terminate 88 in an associate degree. 89 c.âProfessional nursing education programs that terminate 90 in a diploma. 91 d.âPractical nursing education programs. 92 2.âIf an approved programâs graduate passage rates do not 93 equal or exceed the required passage rates for 2 consecutive 94 calendar years, the board shall place the program on 95 probationary status pursuant to chapter 120 and the program 96 director shall appear before the board to present a plan for 97 remediation, which shall include specific benchmarks to identify 98 progress toward a graduate passage rate goal. The program must 99 remain on probationary status until it achieves a graduate 100 passage rate that equals or exceeds the required passage rate 101 for any 1 calendar year. The board shall deny a program 102 application for a new prelicensure nursing education program 103 submitted by an educational institution if the institution has 104 an existing program that is already on probationary status. 105 3.âUpon the programâs achievement of a graduate passage 106 rate that equals or exceeds the required passage rate, the 107 board, at its next regularly scheduled meeting following release 108 of the programâs graduate passage rate by the National Council 109 of State Boards of Nursing, shall remove the programâs 110 probationary status. If the program, during the 2 calendar years 111 following its placement on probationary status, does not achieve 112 the required passage rate for any 1 calendar year, the board may 113 extend the programâs probationary status for 1 additional year, 114 provided the program has demonstrated adequate progress toward 115 the graduate passage rate goal by meeting a majority of the 116 benchmarks established in the remediation plan. If the program 117 is not granted the 1-year extension or fails to achieve the 118 required passage rate by the end of such extension, the board 119 shall terminate the program pursuant to chapter 120. 120 Section 2.âSection 464.0125, Florida Statutes, is created 121 to read: 122 464.0125âProvisional licenses.â 123 (1)âThe department shall issue a provisional license to 124 practice as a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse to an 125 applicant who meets all of the following criteria: 126 (a)âHas submitted a completed application for a provisional 127 license to the department in a form prescribed by department 128 rule. 129 (b)âHas graduated from an approved nursing education 130 program and is eligible to take the licensure examination under 131 s. 464.008(1). 132 (c)âHas submitted an application for licensure under s. 133 464.008. 134 (d)âDemonstrates proof of possessing malpractice insurance. 135 (e)âSubmits documentation, in accordance with rules adopted 136 by the board, verifying that the applicant will practice under 137 the direct supervision of a licensed registered nurse or 138 licensed practical nurse as provided in subsection (3). 139 (2)âA provisional license is not renewable and is valid 140 until a full license is granted by the department. However, a 141 provisional license is void if the licensee does not pass the 142 licensure examination approved by the board within 3 months 143 after the date of graduation from an approved nursing education 144 program or if the licensee fails the licensure examination three 145 consecutive times during such 3-month period. If a provisional 146 license is void, the provisional licensee must immediately cease 147 practicing in a licensed nursing position. 148 (3)âAn applicant for a provisional license may not work as 149 a registered nurse or licensed practical nurse until the 150 provisional license is issued. A registered nurse or licensed 151 practical nurse practicing under a provisional license may only 152 do so under the direct supervision of a licensed registered 153 nurse or licensed practical nurse. A supervising nurse may 154 supervise only one licensee at any given time. The supervising 155 nurse must have been licensed for at least 6 months before the 156 supervision period begins and must cosign all patient records 157 produced by the registered nurse or licensed practical nurse 158 practicing under a provisional license. 159 Section 3.âBy July 1, 2026, the Board of Nursing shall 160 submit a formal request to the National Council of State Boards 161 of Nursing to offer the nursing licensing examination and its 162 test preparation materials in Spanish by July 1, 2027, or as 163 soon as possible thereafter. 164 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.